Louisiana, session 2026, SB411.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 39:1798.6(A)(2)(b) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as
follows:
§1798.6. Powers
A. In addition to the powers granted it by the General Nonprofit Corporation
Law, Title 12 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950, the corporation shall have
power to undertake any project, to provide for the financing thereof, and in
connection therewith:
* * *
(2)(a) * * *
(b) To enter into, and to execute such agreements, covenants, conditions, and
contracts as are necessary to properly effectuate leases or subleases by the Office
Facilities Corporation, for a period not to exceed twenty years, of for portions of the
property located in the First Municipal District of the City of New Orleans, Parish
of Orleans, generally bounded by South Liberty Street, Julia Street, Le Rouge Street,
Girod Street, LaSalle Street and Poydras Street (Sugar Bowl Drive), and commonly
referred to as the New Orleans Centre property, including the office tower formerly
known as the Dominion Tower, the retail property formerly known as the New
Orleans Shopping Centre and the associated parking garage facility, for the purpose
of accommodating various agencies of the state government, and provided that any
such lease or sublease between the corporation and the owner of the New Orleans
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 411 ENROLLED
Centre property is perfected and entered into before July 1, 2010. Any such lease or
sublease between the corporation and the owner of the New Orleans Centre property
shall be subject to prior approval of the Joint Legislative Committee on the Budget.
* * *
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without the
signature by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of
Louisiana. If vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act
shall become effective on the say following such approval.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.